District of Columbia statutes.
16-5307

Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

July 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-191, § 2(b), 57 DCR 3400
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 7 of the Uniform Unsworn Foreign Declarations Act.